District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1108.01

Limitations on honoraria and royalties.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, Pub. L. 93-376, title VIII, § 801
as added Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-41, § 2(b), 36 DCR 5758
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-348, § 201, 52 DCR 1991
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1481.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-211, October 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10467).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-27, September 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 8350).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-183, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9225).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 and 3 of Honoraria Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-401, June 26, 2002, 49 DCR 6529).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-86, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4323).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-130, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6843).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-413, April 21, 2004, 51 DCR 4686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Honoraria Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-524, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 9136).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).